Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8579.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 27 of the General Laws entitled "INSURANCE" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 84
PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGERS ACT
27-84-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Pharmacy Benefit Managers Act."
27-84-2. Definitions.
For the purpose of this chapter:
(1) "Controlling person" means any person or entity that directly or indirectly has the power
to direct or cause to be directed the management, control or activities of a pharmacy benefit
manager.
(2) "Health insurance commissioner" or "commissioner" means the office of health
insurance commissioner.
(3) "Insured" or "covered individual" means any person who is entitled to have pharmacy
services paid by an insurer pursuant to a policy, certificate, contract, or agreement of insurance or
coverage.
(4) "Insurer" means a health insurance carrier as defined in chapters 18, 19, 20, and 41 of
this title.
(5) "Pharmacy benefit management services" means the management or administration of

prescription drug benefit for an insurer, directly or indirectly through another entity, and regardless
of whether the pharmacy benefit manager and the insurer are related, or associated by ownership,
common ownership, organization or otherwise. Such management or administration of prescription
drug benefit includes, but is not limited to:
(i) The administration or management of prescription drug benefits;
(ii) Claims processing, retail network management, or payment of claims to pharmacies for
dispensing prescription drugs;
(iii) Clinical or other formulary or preferred drug list development or management;
(iv) Negotiation or administration of rebates, discounts, payment differentials, or other
incentives, for the inclusion of particular prescription drugs in a particular category or to promote
the placement of particular prescription drugs on a formulary or preferred drug list;
(v) Patient compliance, therapeutic intervention, or generic substitution programs;
(vi) Disease management;
(vii) Drug utilization review or prior authorization;
(viii) Adjudication of appeals or grievances related to prescription drug coverage;
(ix) Contracting with network pharmacies; and
(x) Controlling the cost of covered prescription drugs.
(6) "Pharmacy benefit manager" or "PBM" shall have the meaning provided in § 27-19-
26.2.
(7) "Rebate" means all price concessions paid by a manufacturer to a pharmacy benefit
manager or insurer, including rebates, discounts, and other price concessions that are based on the
actual or estimated utilization of a prescription drug. Rebates also include price concessions based
on the effectiveness of a drug as in a value-based or performance-based contract.
(8) "Restricted pharmacy network" shall have the meaning provided in § 27-29.1-1.
(9) "Spread pricing" means any amount charged or claimed by a pharmacy benefit manager
for a prescription drug that exceeds the amount paid by the pharmacy benefit manager to a
pharmacy or pharmacist for the dispensing of the prescription drug.
27-84-3. Certificate of authority required.
(a) No person, firm, association, corporation or other entity may act, offer to act as, or hold
itself out to be a pharmacy benefit manager, without having a valid certificate of authority as a
pharmacy benefit manager issued by the health insurance commissioner. Notwithstanding the
requirements of this section, for a period of up to two (2) years after the date on which the health
insurance commissioner issues a guidance document outlining the application process for entities
to obtain a valid certificate of authority as a pharmacy benefits manager, a person, firm, association,
LC006503/SUB A - Page 2 of 12

corporation or other entity may act, offer to act as, or hold itself out to be a pharmacy benefit
manager if it has obtained a provisional pharmacy benefit manager certificate of authority (a
provisional certificate of authority) issued by the health insurance commissioner. The health
insurance commissioner may establish minimum registration standards required for a provisional
certificate of authority. Any person, firm, association or corporation who applies for a provisional
certificate of authority shall make an application to the commissioner in such form(s) and
supplements as required by the commissioner. The commissioner may issue a provisional
certificate of authority to applicants that have complied with the commissioner's minimum
provisional certificate of authority standards. The commissioner may reject an application for a
provisional certificate of authority that fails to comply with the minimum standards. Upon at least
sixty (60) days' notice, the commissioner may advise a holder of a provisional certificate of
authority that the provisional certificate of authority will expire as of a certain date. The
commissioner may revoke a provisional certificate of authority upon at least sixty (60) days' notice
for any reason. For each business entity, the officer(s) and director(s) named in the provisional
certificate of authority and the successors thereof shall be responsible for the business entity's
compliance with the applicable laws, rules and regulations of this state.
(b) Any person, firm, association, corporation or other entity that violates this section shall,
in addition to any other penalty provided by law, be liable for restitution and compensatory
damages to any insurer, pharmacy or covered individual, or other person harmed by the violation
and shall also be subject to either a penalty not exceeding the greater of ten thousand dollars
($10,000) for the first violation and fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each subsequent
violation; or the aggregate gross receipts attributable to all violations.
27-84-4. Requirements for pharmacy benefit managers.
(a) Any person, firm, association or corporation who applies to be certified as a pharmacy
benefit manager shall make an application to the commissioner in such form(s) and supplements
required by the commissioner. The commissioner may issue a certificate of authority to applicants
that have complied with the requirements of this chapter. The commissioner may reject an
application filed by a pharmacy benefit manager that fails to comply with the requirements of this
chapter.
(b) For each business entity, the officer(s) and director(s) named in the application and the
successors thereof shall be responsible for the business entity's compliance with the applicable
laws, rules and regulations of this state.
(c) Applicants to be a pharmacy benefit manager shall make an application to the health
insurance commissioner upon a form to be furnished by the commissioner. The application shall
LC006503/SUB A - Page 3 of 12

include or be accompanied by the following information and documents:
(1) All basic organizational documents of the pharmacy benefit manager including, but not
limited to, any articles of incorporation, articles of association, partnership agreement, trade name
certificate, trust agreement, shareholder agreement, and other applicable documents and all
amendments to those documents;
(2) The bylaws, rules, regulations, or similar documents regulating the internal affairs of
the pharmacy benefit manager;
(3) The names, addresses, official positions, and professional qualifications of the
individuals who are responsible for the conduct of affairs of the pharmacy benefit manager;
including, all members of the board of directors, board of trustees, executive committee, or other
governing board or committee; the principal officers in the case of a corporation or the partners or
members in the case of a partnership or association; shareholders holding directly or indirectly ten
percent (10%) or more of the voting securities of the pharmacy benefit manager; and any other
person who exercises control or influence over the affairs of the pharmacy benefit manager;
(4) Annual financial statements or reports for the two (2) most recent years which prove
that the applicant is solvent and any information that the health insurance commissioner may
require in order to review the current financial condition of the applicant;
(5) A statement describing the business plan of the pharmacy benefit manager including,
but not limited to, information pertaining to staffing levels and activities proposed in this state and
nationwide. The plan shall provide details setting forth the pharmacy benefit manager's capability
for providing a sufficient number of experienced and qualified personnel in the areas of claims
processing, recordkeeping and underwriting;
(6) Standards and practices utilized by the pharmacy benefit manager for:
(i) The creation of pharmacy networks and contracting with network pharmacies and other
providers in compliance with chapter 29.1 of title 27, including promotion and use of independent
and community pharmacies and patient access;
(ii) Development of pricing models used by pharmacy benefit manager both for their
services to an insurer and for the payment of services to a pharmacy benefit manager by a third-
party administrator; and
(iii) Protection of consumers; and
(7) Any other pertinent information that may be required by the commissioner on any of
the following related to a pharmacy benefit manager's operations in any state including, but not
limited to:
(i) Conflicts of interest between pharmacy benefit managers and insurers;
LC006503/SUB A - Page 4 of 12

(ii) Deceptive practices in connection with the performance of pharmacy benefit
management services;
(iii) Anti-competitive practices in connection with the performance of pharmacy benefit
management services; and
(iv) Unfair claims practices in connection with the performance of pharmacy benefit
management services.
(d) The applicant shall make available, for inspection by the office of the health insurance
commissioner, copies of all contracts with insurers, third-party benefit administrators, and other
persons or entities utilizing the services of the pharmacy benefit manager in this state.
(e) A pharmacy benefit manager shall immediately notify the office of the health insurance
commissioner of any material change in its ownership, control, or other fact or circumstance
affecting its qualification for a certificate of authority in this state. Any pharmacy benefit manager
holding a certificate issued under this chapter shall inform the office of the health insurance
commissioner by a means acceptable to the commissioner of a change of address within thirty (30)
days of the change.
27-84-5. Certificate of authority term, renewal, and fees.
(a) Any person, firm, association or corporation who applies to be certified as a pharmacy
benefit manager shall provide with the submission of an application to the office of the health
insurance commissioner a fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each year or fraction of a year
in which a certificate shall be valid. Any person, firm, association or corporation who applies for a
provisional certificate of authority as a pharmacy benefit manager shall provide with the submission
of an application to the office of the health insurance commissioner a fee of ten thousand dollars
($10,000).
(b) Every pharmacy benefit manager's certificate of authority shall expire twenty-four (24)
months after the date of issue. Every certificate of authority issued pursuant to this chapter may be
renewed for the ensuing period of twenty-four (24) months upon the filing of an application and
renewal fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in conformity with this chapter.
(c) If an application for a renewal certificate of authority shall have been filed with the
office of the health insurance commissioner at least two (2) months before its expiration, then the
certificate sought to be renewed shall continue in full force and effect either until the issuance by
the health insurance commissioner of the renewal certificate applied for or until five (5) days after
the commissioner shall have refused to issue such renewal certificate and given notice of such
refusal to the applicant.
(d) The health insurance commissioner may refuse to issue a pharmacy benefit manager's
LC006503/SUB A - Page 5 of 12

certificate of authority if, in the commissioner's judgment, the applicant or any member, principal,
officer or director of the applicant, is not trustworthy and competent to act as or in connection with
a pharmacy benefit manager, or that any of the foregoing has given cause for revocation or
suspension of such license, or has failed to comply with any prerequisite for the issuance of such
license.
(e) Pharmacy benefit manager applicants and certificate holders shall be subject to
examination by the office of the health insurance commissioner as often as the commissioner may
deem it expedient. The commissioner may promulgate any necessary regulations establishing
methods and procedures for facilitating and verifying compliance with the requirements of this
chapter.
(f) The commissioner may issue a replacement for a currently in-force certificate that has
been lost or destroyed. Before the replacement certificate shall be issued, there shall be on file with
the office of the health insurance commissioner a written application for the replacement certificate,
affirming under penalty of perjury that the original certificate has been lost or destroyed, together
with a fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000).
27-84-6. Reporting requirements for pharmacy benefit managers.
(a) On or before July first of each year, every pharmacy benefit manager shall report to the
office of the health insurance commissioner, in a statement subscribed and affirmed as true under
penalties of perjury, the information requested by the commissioner including, but not limited to:
(1) Any pricing discounts, rebates of any kind, inflationary payments, credits, clawbacks,
fees, grants, chargebacks, reimbursements, other financial or other reimbursements, incentives,
inducements, refunds or other benefit received by the pharmacy benefit manager;
(2) The terms and conditions of any contract or arrangement, including other financial or
other reimbursements incentives, inducements or refunds between the pharmacy benefit manager
and any other party relating to pharmacy benefit management services provided to an insurer
including, but not limited to, dispensing fees paid to pharmacies;
(3) The following information attributable to patient utilization of prescription drugs
covered by insurers in the state including, but not limited to:
(i) The aggregated dollar amount of rebates and fees collected from pharmaceutical
manufacturers;
(ii) The aggregated dollar amount of rebates and fees collected from pharmaceutical
manufacturers that were passed to insurers;
(iii) The aggregated dollar amount of rebates and fees collected from pharmaceutical
manufacturers passed to covered individuals at the point of sale of a prescription drug; and
LC006503/SUB A - Page 6 of 12

(iv) The aggregated dollar amount of rebates and fees collected from pharmaceutical
manufacturers that were retained by the pharmacy benefit manager.
(4) A response to a set of standard questions developed by the commissioner regarding
business practices including, but not limited to, spread pricing, pharmacy network development,
and utilization management;
(5) The rebate percentage and dollar amount retained by the pharmacy benefit manager for
every rebate, discount, price concession or other consideration under each rebate contract; and
(6) The dollar amount of any other compensation paid by a drug manufacturer to a
pharmacy benefit manager for services, including distribution management services, data or data
services, marketing or promotional services, research programs, or other ancillary services, under
each rebate contract.
(b) The office of the health insurance commissioner may require the filing of quarterly or
other statements, which shall be in such form and shall contain such matters as the commissioner
shall prescribe.
(c) The commissioner may address to any pharmacy benefit manager or its officers any
inquiry in relation to its provision of pharmacy benefit management services or any matter
connected therewith. Every pharmacy benefit manager or person so addressed shall reply in writing
to such inquiry promptly and truthfully, and such reply shall be, if required by the office of the
health insurance commissioner, subscribed by such individual, or by such officer or officers of the
pharmacy benefit manager, as the commissioner shall designate, and affirmed by them as true under
the penalties of perjury.
(d) In the event any pharmacy benefit manager or person does not submit the report
required by subsection (a) of this section, the commissioner is authorized to levy a civil penalty
against such pharmacy benefit manager or person not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per
day for each day beyond the date the report is due or the date specified by the commissioner for
response to the inquiry.
(e) Not later than October 1 of each year, the commissioner shall publish the aggregated
data from all reports for that year required by this section in an appropriate location on the office
of health insurance commissioner's Internet website. The combined aggregated data from the
reports must be published in a manner that does not disclose or tend to disclose proprietary or
confidential information of any pharmacy benefit manager or insurer.
(f) All information, documents and material disclosed by a pharmacy benefit manager
under this section and in the possession or under the control of the office of the health insurance
commissioner shall be deemed confidential and not subject to disclosure except to the extent such
LC006503/SUB A - Page 7 of 12

information is included on an aggregated basis across all pharmacy benefit managers in the
published report required by subsection (e) of this section. This subsection shall not apply to
information, documents and materials where they are in the possession and under the control of a
person or entity other than the commissioner.
27-84-7. Additional obligations.
(a) No pharmacy benefit manager shall violate any provisions of the state law applicable
to pharmacy benefit managers.
(b) No pharmacy benefit manager shall permit any subcontractor, affiliate, subsidiary, or
other individual or entity performing pharmacy benefit management services for a pharmacy
benefit manager to take any action which would violate any provision of law if taken by the
pharmacy benefit manager. A pharmacy benefit manager shall be responsible for the actions of any
subcontractor, affiliate, subsidiary, or other individual or entity who violates any provision of this
article in performance of any pharmacy benefit management services for such pharmacy benefit
manager whether or not the pharmacy benefit manager was aware of, or sanctioned, the conduct.
27-84-8. Grounds for suspension or revocation of certificate of authority.
(a) The commissioner may revoke or suspend the certificate of authority of any pharmacy
benefit manager if, after notice and hearing, the director determines that the pharmacy benefit
manager or any member, principal, officer, commissioner, or controlling person of the pharmacy
benefit manager, has:
(1) Violated any applicable laws, regulations, or orders of the commissioner or another
state's authority who oversees pharmacy benefit managers, or has violated any law in the course of
his or her dealings in such capacity after such certificate of authority has been issued or renewed
pursuant to this chapter;
(2) Provided materially incorrect, materially misleading, materially incomplete or
materially untrue information in the application for a certificate of authority;
(3) Obtained or attempted to obtain a certificate of authority through misrepresentation or
fraud;
(4) Used fraudulent, coercive or dishonest practices;
(5) Demonstrated incompetence;
(6) Demonstrated untrustworthiness; or
(7) Demonstrated financial irresponsibility in the conduct of business in this state or
elsewhere;
(8) Improperly withheld, misappropriated or converted any monies or properties received
in the course of business in this state or elsewhere;
LC006503/SUB A - Page 8 of 12

(9) Intentionally misrepresented the terms of an actual or proposed contract;
(10) Admitted to or been found to have committed any insurance unfair trade practice or
fraud;
(11) Had a pharmacy benefit manager certificate, registration, or license, or its equivalent,
denied, suspended or revoked in any other state, province, district or territory;
(12) Failed to pay state income tax or comply with any administrative or court order
directing payment of state income tax; or
(13) Ceased to meet the requirements for a certificate of authority under this chapter.
(b) Before revoking or suspending the certificate of authority of any pharmacy benefit
manager pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner shall give notice to the holder
of the certificate of authority and shall hold, or cause to be held, an adjudicatory proceeding in
conformity with chapter 35 of title 42.
(c) If a pharmacy benefit manager's certificate of authority in accordance with this section
is revoked or suspended by the commissioner, then the commissioner shall forthwith give notice to
the pharmacy benefit manager. For good cause shown, the commissioner may delay the effective
date of a revocation or suspension to permit the pharmacy benefit manager to satisfy some or all of
its contractual obligations to perform pharmacy benefit management services in the state.
(d) No individual, corporation, firm or association whose certificate of authority as a
pharmacy benefit manager has been revoked pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, and no firm
or association of which such individual is a member, and no corporation of which such individual
is an officer or director, and no controlling person of the holder of the certificate of authority shall
be entitled to obtain any certificate of authority under the provisions of this chapter for a minimum
period of one year after such revocation, or, if such revocation be judicially reviewed, for a
minimum period of one year after the final determination thereof affirming the action of the
commissioner in revoking such certificate.
(e) If any such certificate of authority held by a firm, association or corporation be revoked,
no member of such firm or association and no officer or director of such corporation or any
controlling person of the pharmacy benefit manager shall be entitled to obtain any certificate of
authority under this chapter for the same period of time, unless the commissioner determines that
such member, officer or director was not personally at fault in the matter on account of which such
certificate of authority was revoked.
(f) The commissioner shall retain the authority to enforce the provisions of and impose any
penalty or remedy authorized by this chapter against any person or entity who is under investigation
for or charged with a violation of this chapter, even if the person's or entity's certificate of authority
LC006503/SUB A - Page 9 of 12

has been surrendered, or has expired or has lapsed by operation of law.
(g) A pharmacy benefit manager subject to this chapter shall report to the commissioner
any administrative action taken against the holder of the certificate of authority in another
jurisdiction or by another governmental agency in this state within thirty (30) days of the final
disposition of the matter. This report shall include a copy of any order, consent order, decision or
other relevant legal documents.
(h) Within thirty (30) days of the initial pretrial hearing date, a pharmacy benefit manager
subject to this chapter shall report to the commissioner any criminal prosecution of the holder of
the certificate of authority taken in any jurisdiction. The report shall include a copy of the initial
complaint filed, the order resulting from the hearing and any other relevant legal documents.
(i) Chapter 35 of title 42 ("administrative procedures") shall apply to any notice or hearing
by the commissioner in accordance with this section.
27-84-9. Penalties for violations.
(a) The commissioner, in addition to any other power conferred by law, may, in any one
proceeding by order require the pharmacy benefit manager who violates the provisions of this title,
or related regulation to make restitution and pay compensatory damages, in an amount to be
determined by the commissioner, to any person injured by the unlawful actions of said holder of
certificate of authority and to pay to the people of this state a penalty in a sum not exceeding either
the greater of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each offense and fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000)
for each subsequent violation; or the aggregate gross receipts attributable to all offenses.
(b) Upon the failure of such a holder of a certificate of authority to pay the penalty ordered
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section within twenty (20) days after the mailing of the order,
postage prepaid, registered, and addressed to the last known place of business of the holder of the
certificate of authority, unless the order is stayed by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction,
the commissioner may revoke the holder's certificate of authority or may suspend the same for such
period as the commissioner determines.
27-84-10. Applicability of other laws.
(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt a pharmacy benefit manager from
complying with any other applicable state laws or regulations.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of 2026--H 7127 Substitute A, as amended, Article 12,
Section 13, relating to the Pharmacy Benefit Manager Transparency Reporting and Study Act, shall
have no force and effect and is hereby superseded by the provisions of this chapter.
27-84-11. Assessments.
Holders of a certificate of authority issued pursuant to this chapter and holders of a
LC006503/SUB A - Page 10 of 12

provisional certificate of authority shall be assessed by the commissioner for the operating expenses
of the office of the health insurance commissioner including, but not limited to, any reasonable
expenses of any experts, consultants, and contractors, that are attributable to regulating such
pharmacy benefit managers in such proportions as the commissioner shall deem just and
reasonable.
27-84-12. Rules and regulations.
The office of the health insurance commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to effectuate the purpose of this chapter, including procedures for notice to insurers,
covered individuals, employers, and other organizations of the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC006503/SUB A
========
LC006503/SUB A - Page 11 of 12